North Carolina, session 2025, HB631.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is established the Commission to Study the Feasibility of
Establishing a State Infrastructure Bank. The Commission shall study how the creation of such a
bank could strengthen economic and community development, provide financial resources for
infrastructure projects, and leverage State, federal, and private resources to address the need for
access to sustainable financial assistance for projects that will contribute to economic growth,
job creation, and support of local communities in the State.
SECTION 2. The Commission shall be composed of 17 members as follows:
(1) Three members of the Senate, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate.
(2) Three members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of
the House of Representatives.
(3) Three members to be appointed by the Governor, one of whom shall be a
nationally recognized expert in the area of public finance with expertise in the
area of state-owned banking institutions and one of whom shall have a
background in environmental infrastructure.
(4) The State Treasurer, or the Treasurer's designee.
(5) The State Controller, or the Controller's designee.
(6) A representative from the Office of State Budget and Management, designated
by the State Budget Director.
(7) The Secretary of Transportation, or the Secretary's designee.
(8) One member of the private banking community and one member with a
background in energy infrastructure, both appointed by the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate.
(9) One member with public health experience and one member with workforce
development experience, both appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives.
SECTION 3. Vacancies on the Commission shall be filled by the appointing
authority. The Commission shall be chaired by a senator and a representative designated by the
appointing authority. A quorum of the Commission shall be nine members. The Commission,
*H631-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
while in the discharge of its official duties, may exercise all powers provided for under
G.S. 120-19 and G.S. 120-19.1 through G.S. 120-19.4, including the power to request all
officers, agents, agencies, and departments of the State to provide any information, data, or
documents within their possession, ascertainable from their records, or otherwise available to
them.
SECTION 4. The Commission may meet at any time upon the call of the chairs. The
Commission may meet in the Legislative Building, the Legislative Office Building, or any other
location as agreed upon by the Commission. The Commission may contract for professional,
clerical, or consultant services as provided by G.S. 120-32.02.
SECTION 5. The Commission shall hold at least five public meetings in distinct
geographic regions of the State.
SECTION 6. The Legislative Services Commission, through the Legislative
Services Officer, shall assign professional staff to assist the Commission in its work. The House
of Representatives' and Senate's Directors of Legislative Assistants shall assign clerical staff to
the Commission, and the expenses relating to the clerical employees shall be borne by the
Commission. Members of the Commission shall receive subsistence and travel expenses at the
rates set forth in G.S. 120-3.1, 138-5, or 138-6, as appropriate.
SECTION 7. The Commission shall study the following issues related to the
establishment of a State Infrastructure Bank:
(1) Supporting the economic development of North Carolina by increasing access
to capital.
(2) Providing financing for infrastructure related to housing development, public
works infrastructure, educational infrastructure, student loans, and community
quality of life projects.
(3) Providing capital for continued expansion of the State's transportation,
environmental, energy, and telecommunications infrastructure.
(4) Undertake a general assessment of the State's current network of public and
private financial resources and assess the impact on government services,
including public and private banking services, for the purpose of identifying
potential areas of State infrastructure needs.
(5) Among other resource issues, the Commission shall consider, at a minimum,
how a State Infrastructure Bank could be designed to generate earnings
beyond those necessary for continued operation of the Bank, which could be
used to supplement other capital resources.
(6) Examine various administrative and operational structures for organizing a
State Infrastructure Bank, including boards of directors, sources of deposits,
oversight and audit of financial activities, and guarantees of financial
products.
(7) Consider options for integrating a State Infrastructure Bank model into the
existing State financial resource network, including ideas such as lending
capital to banks and credit unions and whether the State Infrastructure Bank
should be created as a separate entity or involving, using, modifying, or
expanding the existing financial infrastructure or the functions of any other
State agency.
(8) The manner in which the State Infrastructure Bank should be regulated to
protect the safety and soundness of the institution and to avoid conflicts of
interest that could arise from State or federal regulation of the Bank.
(9) The extent to which the State Infrastructure Bank should be allowed to
compete with banking establishments operating in North Carolina.
Page 2 House Bill 631-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(10) The oversight of the State Infrastructure Bank to protect the interests of the
State and the rights of individuals and entities that may access the products or
services, or both, of the Bank.
(11) An outline of transition actions necessary for establishing the State
Infrastructure Bank.
SECTION 8. The Commission may make an interim report, including any legislative
recommendations, to the 2025 General Assembly, 2026 Regular Session, prior to its convening
and shall submit a final report, including any legislative recommendations, by the end of the 2026
Regular Session of the General Assembly. The Commission shall terminate on December 31,
2026, or upon the filing of its final report, whichever occurs first.
SECTION 9. This act is effective when it becomes law.
House Bill 631-First Edition Page 3